South Dakota, session 2026, HB1155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 4-5-26 be AMENDED:
4-5-26. State public funds moneys made available for investment may be invested
in the following classes of securities and investments and, except as provided by § 3-12C-
223; chapter 3-13; chapter 13-63; the permanent school and other educational and
charitable trust funds as provided in S.D. Const., Art. VIII, §§ 2 and 7; the permanent
trust fund containing the net proceeds from the sale of state cement enterprises as
provided in S.D. Const., Art. XIII, § 20; the health care trust fund as provided in S.D.
Const., Art. XII, § 5; and the education enhancement trust fund as provided in S.D.
Const., Art. XII, § 6; not otherwise:
(1) Direct and indirect obligations of the United States government;
(2) Agencies and instrumentalities of the United States government;
(3) Mortgage-backed securities of United States government-sponsored enterprises;
(4) Direct obligations of the State of South Dakota this state and any of its political
subdivisions;
(5) Obligations consisting of notes, bonds, debentures, and certificates, which are direct
obligations of a solvent corporation or trust existing under the laws of the United
States or any state thereof, if such the investments are rated in the four highest
classifications established by at least two standard rating services at the time of
purchase;
(6) Savings accounts, share accounts, and certificates of deposit of banks, savings and
loan associations, and building and loan associations, and bankers' acceptances;
(7) Repurchase agreements fully collateralized by securities described in this section;
(8) Shares in exchange-traded funds and open-end, no-load funds that are
administered by an investment company registered under the Federal Investment
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.334.22 2 1155
Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. §§ 80a-1 to 80a-64, inclusive (January 1, 2026),
whose shares are registered under the Federal Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C.
§§ 77a to 77aa, inclusive (January 1, 2026), and investments are predominantly
in securities described in this section; or and
(9) Bitcoin that meet the requirements of sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this Act.
In addition to the investments authorized by subdivisions (1) to (8) of this
section,inclusive, the investment council the State Investment Council may also allocate
a sum certain of state public funds moneys for investment in the accounts and certificates
of South Dakota banks and associations. This sum shall must initially be offered to South
Dakota banks and associations, and if not initially fully subscribed, the investment officer
shall must immediately reoffer the unsubscribed sum to other qualified public depositories
defined by subdivision 4-6A-1(7) in § 4-6A-1.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 4-5:
Terms used in sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this Act mean:
(1) "Bitcoin," a digital asset that:
(a) Is native to the decentralized peer-to-peer blockchain network that
originates from the genesis block created on January 3, 2009; and
(b) Maintains an unbroken chain of blocks from the genesis block through the
chain recognized by the network of independent nodes as having the
greatest cumulative proof of work;
(2) "Digital asset," virtual currency, cryptocurrencies, natively electronic assets, and
other digital-only assets that confer economic, proprietary, or access rights or
powers;
(3) "Exchange-traded product," any financial instrument that:
(a) Is approved by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the United States
Commodity Futures Trading Commission, or the Division of Banking;
(b) Is traded on a United States regulated exchange; and
(c) Derives value from an underlying pool of assets;
(4) "Private key," a unique element of cryptographic data used for signing transactions
on a blockchain and known only by the owner;
(5) "Qualified custodian," any federal or state-chartered bank, trust company, or
special purpose depository institution or company regulated by the Division of
Banking, which is authorized to maintain custody of digital assets;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.334.22 3 1155
(6) "Registered investment company," a financial services company regulated by the
United States Securities and Exchange Commission and registered under 15 U.S.C.
§§ 77a to 77aa, inclusive (January 1, 2026), and 15 U.S.C. §§ 80a-1 to 80a-64,
inclusive (January 1, 2026); and
(7) "Secure custody solution," a technological product or blended product and service
that meets the requirements set forth in section 5 of this Act.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 4-5:
The amount of state moneys that the State Investment Council may invest in
Bitcoin may not exceed ten percent of the state moneys made available for investment.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 4-5:
Any Bitcoin acquired as an investment must be held:
(1) Directly by the State Investment Council through the use of a secure custody
solution;
(2) On behalf of the State Investment Council by a qualified custodian; or
(3) In the form of an exchange-traded product issued by a registered investment
company.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 4-5:
The secure custody solution required pursuant to section 4 of this Act must have
the following characteristics:
(1) The private key is exclusively controlled by the State Investment Council;
(2) The private key is exclusively contained within an encrypted, hardware-secured
environment and is used only to sign and authorize cryptocurrency transactions
through end-to-end encryption channels;
(3) Passwordless non-asset keys must be included for authentication and endorsement
of action to initiate the movement of assets, provided that the keys are stored
within a government device;
(4) Any hardware that contains the private key is maintained in at least two
geographically diverse, secure data centers;
(5) The secure custody solution enforces a multi-party governance structure for
authorizing transactions, enforces user access controls, and logs all user-initiated
actions;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.334.22 4 1155
(6) The provider of the secure custody solution has implemented a disaster recovery
protocol that ensures customer access to assets in the event the provider becomes
unavailable; and
(7) The secure custody solution undergoes regular code audits and penetration testing
from audit firms, and any identified vulnerabilities are promptly remedied.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.